Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 39 Cardiopulmonary Resuscitation

Cross references.

Advance directives for health care, T. 31, C. 32.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1991, this chapter, which was designated as Chapter 38 of Title 31, was redesignated as Chapter 39 thereof, since there exists another Chapter 38 of Title 31.

Law reviews.

For annual survey article on domestic relations law, see 45 Mercer L. Rev. 215 (1993).

For note on 1995 amendments and enactments of Code sections in this chapter, see 12 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 223 (1995).

For article, “Medical Decision-Making in Georgia,” see 10 Ga. St. B.J. 50 (2005).

31-39-1.
Legislative findings and intent.

The General Assembly finds that although cardiopulmonary resuscitation has proved invaluable in the reversal of sudden, unexpected death, it is appropriate for an attending physician, in certain circumstances, to issue an order not to attempt cardiopulmonary resuscitation of a patient where appropriate consent or authorization has been obtained.
The General Assembly further finds that there is a need to establish and clarify the rights and obligations of patients, their families or representatives, and health care providers regarding cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the issuance of orders not to resuscitate.
The General Assembly further finds that, in the interest of protecting individual autonomy, cardiopulmonary resuscitation in some circumstances may cause loss of patient dignity and unnecessary pain and suffering. In recognition of the considerable uncertainty in the medical and legal professions as to the legality of implementing orders not to resuscitate, in recognition of the request of the Supreme Court of Georgia for legislative guidance in this area, and in recognition of the dignity and privacy which patients have a right to expect, the General Assembly declares that the laws of the State of Georgia shall recognize the right of patients or other authorized persons to instruct physicians and other health care personnel to refrain from cardiopulmonary resuscitation.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-39-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1853, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 672, § 1.

31-39-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Adult” means any person who is 18 years of age or older, is the parent of a child, or has married.

“Attending physician” means the physician selected by or assigned to a patient to have primary responsibility for the treatment and care of the patient. Where more than one physician share such responsibility, any such physician may act as the attending physician pursuant to this chapter.

“Authorized person” means any one person from the following list in the order of priority as listed below:

Any agent under a durable power of attorney for health care or health care agent under an advance directive for health care appointed pursuant to Chapter 32 of this title;

A spouse;

A guardian over the person appointed pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 29-4-1;

A son or daughter 18 years of age or older;

A parent; or

A brother or sister 18 years of age or older.

“Candidate for nonresuscitation” means a patient who, based on a determination to a reasonable degree of medical certainty by an attending physician with the concurrence of another physician:

Has a medical condition which can reasonably be expected to result in the imminent death of the patient;

Is in a noncognitive state with no reasonable possibility of regaining cognitive functions; or

Is a person for whom cardiopulmonary resuscitation would be medically futile in that such resuscitation will likely be unsuccessful in restoring cardiac and respiratory function or will only restore cardiac and respiratory function for a brief period of time so that the patient will likely experience repeated need for cardiopulmonary resuscitation over a short period of time or that such resuscitation would be otherwise medically futile.

“Cardiopulmonary resuscitation” means only those measures used to restore or support cardiac or respiratory function in the event of a cardiac or respiratory arrest.

(5.1)

“Caregiver” means an unlicensed assistant who provides direct health related care to patients or residents, a proxy caregiver performing health maintenance activities as provided in Code Section 43-26-12, or a person performing auxiliary services in the care of patients as provided in Code Section 43-26-12.

“Decision-making capacity” means the ability to understand and appreciate the nature and consequences of an order not to resuscitate, including the benefits and disadvantages of such an order, and to reach an informed decision regarding the order.

(6.1)

“Emergency medical technician” means a person certified as an emergency medical technician, paramedic, or cardiac technician under Chapter 11 of this title.

“Health care facility” means an institution which is licensed as a hospital or nursing home pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 7 of this title or licensed as a hospice pursuant to Article 9 of Chapter 7 of this title, or a home health agency licensed pursuant to Article 7 of Chapter 7 of this title.

“Minor” means any person who is not an adult.

(8.1)

“Nurse” means a person who is a licensed practical nurse as provided in Code Section 43-26-32 or a registered professional nurse as provided in Code Section 43-26-3.

“Order not to resuscitate” means an order not to attempt cardiopulmonary resuscitation in the event a patient suffers cardiac or respiratory arrest, or both.

“Parent” means a parent who has custody of a minor, or person with legal authority to act on behalf of a minor, or is the parent of an adult without decision-making capacity.

“Patient” means a person who is receiving care and treatment from an attending physician.

(11.1)

“Physician assistant” means a person licensed as a physician assistant pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 34 of Title 43.

“Reasonably available” means that a person to be contacted can be contacted with diligent efforts by an attending physician, another person acting on behalf of the attending physician, or the health care facility within a reasonable period of time as determined by the attending physician.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-39-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1853, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 672, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 722, §§ 1, 1.1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 7; Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 15/HB 24; Ga. L. 2011, p. 379, § 1/HB 275; Ga. L. 2021, p. 546, § 2-1/HB 128.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted “minor, or person with legal authority to act on behalf of a minor, or is the parent of an adult” for “minor or is the parent of an adult” in paragraph (10).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 1/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(a) The General Assembly has long recognized the right of the individual to control all aspects of his or her personal care and medical treatment, including the right to insist upon medical treatment, decline medical treatment, or direct that medical treatment be withdrawn.
In order to secure these rights, the General Assembly has adopted and amended statutes recognizing the living will and health care agency and provided statutory forms for both documents.

“(b) The General Assembly has determined that the statutory forms for the living will and durable power of attorney for health care are confusing and inconsistent and that the statutes providing for the living will and health care agency contain conflicting concepts, inconsistent and out-of-date terminology, and confusing and inconsistent requirements for execution. In addition, there is a commendable trend among the states to combine the concepts of the living will and health care agency into a single legal document.

“(c) The General Assembly recognizes that a significant number of individuals representing the academic, medical, legislative, and legal communities, state officials, ethics scholars, and advocacy groups worked together to develop the advance directive for health care contained in this Act, and the collective intent was to create a form that uses understandable and everyday language in order to encourage more citizens of this state to execute advance directives for health care.

“(d) The General Assembly finds that the clear expression of an individual’s decisions regarding health care, whether made by the individual or an agent appointed by the individual, is of critical importance not only to citizens but also to the health care and legal communities, third parties, and families. In furtherance of these purposes, the General Assembly enacts a new Chapter 32 of Title 31, setting forth general principles governing the expression of decisions regarding health care and the appointment of a health care agent, as well as a form of advance directive for health care.”

Ga. L. 2021, p. 546, § 1-1/HB 128, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This part shall be known and may be cited as ‘Gracie’s Law.”’

Ga. L. 2021, p. 546, § 1-2/HB 128, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) A mental or physical disability does not diminish a person’s right to health care;

“(2) The Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. Section 12101, et seq., prohibits discrimination against persons with disabilities, yet many individuals with disabilities still experience discrimination in accessing critical health care services;

“(3) In other states, individuals with physical or mental disabilities have been denied lifesaving organ transplants based on assumptions that their lives are less worthy, that they are incapable of complying with posttransplant medical requirements, or that they lack adequate support systems to ensure compliance with posttransplant medical requirements;

“(4) Although organ transplant centers shall consider medical and psychosocial criteria when determining if a patient is suitable to receive an organ transplant, transplant centers that participate in Medicare, Medicaid, or other federally funded programs are required to use patient selection criteria that result in a fair and nondiscriminatory distribution of organs; and

“(5) Georgia residents in need of organ transplants are entitled to assurances that they will not encounter discrimination on the basis of a disability.”

Law reviews.

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 273 (2015).

31-39-3.
Patient presumed to consent to administration of cardiopulmonary resuscitation; patient’s order not to resuscitate; health care facilities not required to expand to provide cardiopulmonary resuscitation.

Every patient shall be presumed to consent to the administration of cardiopulmonary resuscitation in the event of cardiac or respiratory arrest, unless there is consent or authorization for the issuance of an order not to resuscitate. Such presumption of consent does not presume that every patient shall be administered cardiopulmonary resuscitation, but rather that every patient agrees to its administration unless it is medically futile.

Every adult shall be presumed to have the capacity to make a decision regarding cardiopulmonary resuscitation unless determined otherwise in writing in the patient’s medical record pursuant to this Code section or pursuant to a court order. When an order not to resuscitate is requested by an adult with decision-making capacity, such order shall be presumed, unless revoked pursuant to Code Section 31-39-6, to be the direction of such person regarding resuscitation.

Nothing in this chapter shall require a health care facility, any other facility, or a health care provider to expand its existing equipment and facilities to provide cardiopulmonary resuscitation.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-39-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1853, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 672, § 1.

31-39-4.
Persons authorized to issue order not to resuscitate.

It shall be lawful for the attending physician to issue an order not to resuscitate pursuant to the requirements of this chapter. Any written order issued by the attending physician using the term “do not resuscitate,” “DNR,” “order not to resuscitate,” “do not attempt resuscitation,” “DNAR,” “no code,” “allow natural death,” “AND,” “order to allow natural death,” or substantially similar language in the patient’s chart shall constitute a legally sufficient order and shall authorize a physician, health care professional, nurse, physician assistant, caregiver, or emergency medical technician to withhold or withdraw cardiopulmonary resuscitation. Such an order shall remain effective, whether or not the patient is receiving treatment from or is a resident of a health care facility, until the order is canceled as provided in Code Section 31-39-5 or until consent for such order is revoked as provided in Code Section 31-39-6, whichever occurs earlier. An attending physician who has issued such an order and who transfers care of the patient to another physician shall inform the receiving physician and the health care facility, if applicable, of the order.

An adult person with decision-making capacity may consent orally or in writing to an order not to resuscitate and its implementation at a present or future date, regardless of that person’s mental or physical condition on such future date. If the attending physician determines at any time that an order not to resuscitate issued at the request of the patient is no longer appropriate because the patient’s medical condition has improved, the physician shall immediately notify the patient.

The appropriate authorized person may, after being informed of the provisions of this Code section, consent orally or in writing to an order not to resuscitate for an adult candidate for nonresuscitation; provided, however, that such consent is based in good faith upon what such authorized person determines such candidate for nonresuscitation would have wanted had such candidate for nonresuscitation understood the circumstances under which such order is being considered. Where such authorized person is an agent under a durable power of attorney for health care or a health care agent under an advance directive for health care appointed pursuant to Chapter 32 of this title or where a Physician Orders for Life-Sustaining Treatment form with a code status of “do not resuscitate” or its equivalent has been executed in accordance with Code Section 31-1-14 by an authorized person who is an agent under a durable power of attorney for health care or a health care agent under an advance directive for health care appointed pursuant to Chapter 32 of this title, the attending physician may issue an order not to resuscitate a candidate for nonresuscitation pursuant to the requirements of this chapter without the concurrence of another physician, notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (4) of Code Section 31-39-2.

When a minor child is a candidate for nonresuscitation, an order not to resuscitate may be issued only with the oral or written consent of the minor’s parent, unless an exception applies pursuant to subsection (e) of this Code section. If in the opinion of the attending physician the minor is of sufficient maturity to understand the nature and effect of an order not to resuscitate, then no such order shall be valid without the assent of such minor.

If none of the persons specified in subsections (b), (c), and (d) of this Code section is reasonably available or competent to make a decision regarding an order not to resuscitate, an attending physician may issue an order not to resuscitate for a patient, provided that:

Such physician determines with the concurrence of a second physician, in writing in the patient’s medical record, that such patient is a candidate for nonresuscitation;

An ethics committee or similar panel, as designated by the health care facility, concurs in the opinion of the attending physician and the concurring physician that the patient is a candidate for nonresuscitation; and

The patient is receiving inpatient or outpatient treatment from or is a resident of a health care facility other than a hospice or a home health agency.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-39-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1853, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 672, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 31; Ga. L. 1995, p. 722, §§ 2, 2.1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 298, § 1/HB 69; Ga. L. 2011, p. 379, § 2/HB 275; Ga. L. 2015, p. 305, § 2/SB 109; Ga. L. 2021, p. 546, § 2-2/HB 128.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the first sentence of subsection (d), which read: “Any parent may consent orally or in writing to an order not to resuscitate for his or her minor child when such child is a candidate for nonresuscitation.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 546, § 1-1/HB 128, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This part shall be known and may be cited as ‘Gracie’s Law.”’

Ga. L. 2021, p. 546, § 1-2/HB 128, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) A mental or physical disability does not diminish a person’s right to health care;

“(2) The Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. Section 12101, et seq., prohibits discrimination against persons with disabilities, yet many individuals with disabilities still experience discrimination in accessing critical health care services;

“(3) In other states, individuals with physical or mental disabilities have been denied lifesaving organ transplants based on assumptions that their lives are less worthy, that they are incapable of complying with posttransplant medical requirements, or that they lack adequate support systems to ensure compliance with posttransplant medical requirements;

“(4) Although organ transplant centers shall consider medical and psychosocial criteria when determining if a patient is suitable to receive an organ transplant, transplant centers that participate in Medicare, Medicaid, or other federally funded programs are required to use patient selection criteria that result in a fair and nondiscriminatory distribution of organs; and

“(5) Georgia residents in need of organ transplants are entitled to assurances that they will not encounter discrimination on the basis of a disability.”

Law reviews.

For article, “Are There Checks and Balances on Terminating the Lives of Children with Disabilities? Should There Be?,” see 25 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 959 (2009).

31-39-5.
Cancellation of order not to resuscitate.

An attending physician for whose patient an order not to resuscitate has been issued pursuant to subsection (c), (d), or (e) of Code Section 31-39-4 shall examine that patient at such intervals as determined periodically by the physician to determine whether the patient still qualifies as a candidate for nonresuscitation, unless that order has been canceled or consent thereto revoked as provided in this chapter. That physician shall record such determination in the patient’s medical chart. Failure to comply with this subsection shall not invalidate that order.

If the order not to resuscitate was entered pursuant to subsection (c), (d), or (e) of Code Section 31-39-4 and the attending physician who issued the order or, if that attending physician is unavailable, another attending physician, at any time determines that the patient no longer qualifies as a candidate for nonresuscitation, the attending physician or the physician’s designee shall immediately include such determination in the patient’s chart, cancel the order, and notify the patient, the person who consented to the order, and all health care facility staff responsible for the patient’s care of the cancellation.

If an order not to resuscitate was entered pursuant to subsection (c), (d), or (e) of Code Section 31-39-4 and the patient at any time regains decision-making capacity, the attending physician who issued the order or, if that attending physician is unavailable, another attending physician, shall immediately determine if the patient consents to the order not to resuscitate and, if the patient does not so consent, the attending physician or the physician’s designee shall cancel the order by an appropriate entry on the record and notify all health care facility staff responsible for the patient’s care of the cancellation.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-39-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1853, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 672, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 722, § 2.2.

31-39-6.
Revocation of consent to order not to resuscitate.

A patient may, at any time, revoke his or her consent to an order not to resuscitate by making either a written or an oral declaration or by any other act evidencing a specific intent to revoke such consent which is communicated to or in the presence of an attending physician, nurse, physician assistant, caregiver, health care professional, or emergency medical technician.

Any parent or authorized person may at any time revoke his or her consent to an order not to resuscitate a patient by making either a written or an oral declaration or by any other act evidencing a specific intent to revoke such consent which is communicated to or in the presence of an attending physician, nurse, physician assistant, caregiver, health care professional, or emergency medical technician.

Any physician who is informed of or provided with a revocation of consent pursuant to this Code section shall, either by himself or herself or by designee, immediately include the revocation in the patient’s chart, cancel the order, and notify any health care facility staff responsible for the patient’s care of the revocation and cancellation. Any member of the nursing staff, or a physician assistant, caregiver, health care professional, or emergency medical technician who is informed of or provided with a revocation of consent pursuant to this Code section shall immediately notify a physician of such revocation.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-39-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1853, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 672, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 722, § 4; Ga. L. 2011, p. 379, § 3/HB 275.

31-39-6.1.
Form of order not to resuscitate; bracelet or necklace; revocation or cancellation of order.

In addition to those orders not to resuscitate authorized elsewhere in this chapter, any physician, health care professional, nurse, physician assistant, caregiver, or emergency medical technician shall be authorized to effectuate an order not to resuscitate for a person who is not a patient in a hospital, nursing home, or licensed hospice if the order is evidenced in writing containing the patient’s name, date of the form, printed name of the attending physician, and signature of the attending physician on a form substantially similar to the following:

Click to view

A person who is not a patient in a hospital, nursing home, or licensed hospice and who has an order not to resuscitate pursuant to this Code section may wear an identifying bracelet on either the wrist or the ankle or an identifying necklace and shall post or place a prominent notice in such person’s home. The bracelet shall be substantially similar to identification bracelets worn in hospitals. The bracelet, necklace, or notice shall provide the following information in boldface type:

Click to view

Any physician, health care professional, nurse, physician assistant, caregiver, or emergency medical technician shall be authorized to regard such a bracelet, necklace, or notice as a legally sufficient order not to resuscitate in the same manner as an order issued pursuant to this chapter unless such person has actual knowledge that such order has been canceled or consent thereto revoked as provided in this chapter.

Any order not to resuscitate evidenced pursuant to subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section may be revoked as provided in Code Section 31-39-6 and may be canceled as provided in Code Section 31-39-5.

“DO NOT RESUSCITATE ORDER NAME OF PATIENT: THIS CERTIFIES THAT AN ORDER NOT TO RESUSCITATE HAS BEEN ENTERED ON THE ABOVE-NAMED PATIENT. SIGNED: ATTENDING PHYSICIAN PRINTED OR TYPED NAME OF ATTENDING PHYSICIAN: ATTENDING PHYSICIAN’S TELEPHONE NUMBER: DATE: ”

“DO NOT RESUSCITATE ORDER Patient’s name: Authorized person’s name and telephone number, if applicable: Patient’s physician’s printed name and telephone number: Date of order not to resuscitate: ”

History.

Code 1981, §

31-39-6.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 722, § 3; Ga. L. 2011, p. 379, § 4/HB 275.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, “of” was substituted for “or” preceding “this Code section” in subsection (c).

31-39-7.
Liability of persons carrying out in good faith decisions regarding cardiopulmonary resuscitation; notification of next of kin or authorized person of patient by physician refusing to comply with order not to resuscitate.

No physician, health care professional, nurse, physician assistant, caregiver, health care facility, other licensed facility, emergency medical technician, or person employed by, acting as the agent of, or under contract with any of the foregoing shall be subject to criminal prosecution or civil liability or be deemed to have engaged in unprofessional conduct for carrying out in good faith a decision regarding cardiopulmonary resuscitation authorized by this chapter by or on behalf of a patient or for those actions taken in compliance with the standards and procedures set forth in this chapter.

No physician, health care professional, nurse, physician assistant, caregiver, health care facility, other licensed facility, emergency medical technician, or person employed by, acting as the agent of, or under contract with any of the foregoing shall be subject to criminal prosecution or civil liability or be deemed to have engaged in unprofessional conduct for providing cardiopulmonary resuscitation to a patient for whom an order not to resuscitate has been issued, provided that such physician or person:

Reasonably and in good faith was unaware of the issuance of an order not to resuscitate; or

Reasonably and in good faith believed that consent to the order not to resuscitate had been revoked or canceled.

No persons shall be civilly liable for failing or refusing in good faith to effectuate an order not to resuscitate. No person shall be subject to criminal prosecution or civil liability for consenting or declining to consent in good faith, on behalf of a patient, to the issuance of an order not to resuscitate pursuant to this chapter.

Any attending physician who fails or refuses to comply with an order not to resuscitate entered pursuant to this chapter shall endeavor to advise promptly the patient, if conscious, or the next of kin or authorized person of the patient that such physician is unwilling to effectuate the order. The attending physician shall thereafter at the election of the next of kin or authorized person:

Make a good faith attempt to effect the transfer of the patient to another physician who will effectuate the order not to resuscitate; or

Permit the next of kin or authorized person to obtain another physician who will effectuate the order not to resuscitate.

Any emergency medical technician who fails or refuses to comply with an order not to resuscitate entered pursuant to this chapter shall endeavor to advise promptly the patient, if conscious, or the next of kin or authorized person of the patient, if reasonably available, that such emergency medical technician is unwilling to effectuate the order.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-39-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1853, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 722, § 5; Ga. L. 2011, p. 379, § 5/HB 275.

31-39-8.
Effect of order not to resuscitate on life insurance policies.

No policy of life insurance shall be legally impaired, modified, or invalidated in any manner by the issuance of an order not to resuscitate notwithstanding any term of the policy to the contrary.

A person may not prohibit or require the issuance of an order not to resuscitate for an individual as a condition for such individual’s being insured or receiving health care services.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-39-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1853, § 1.

31-39-9.
Effect of chapter on legal rights and responsibilities; right of court to approve order not to resuscitate.

Nothing in this chapter shall impair or supersede any legal right or legal responsibility which any person may have to effect the withholding or withdrawal of cardiopulmonary resuscitation in any lawful manner or affect the validity of orders not to resuscitate issued and implemented under other circumstances. In such respect, the provisions of this chapter are cumulative.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to preclude a court of competent jurisdiction from approving the issuance of an order not to resuscitate under circumstances other than those under which such an order may be issued pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-39-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1853, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 672, § 2.